Washington statutes.
RCW 2.10.230

Cessation of benefits upon appointment or election to court.

Any person receiving retirement benefits from this system who is appointed or elected to a court under chapter 2.04, 2.06, or 2.08 RCW shall upon the first day of entering such office become a member of this system and his or her retirement benefits shall cease. Pro tempore service as a judge of a court of record shall not constitute appointment as that term is used in this section. Upon leaving such office, a person shall have his or her benefits recomputed or restored, as determined in this chapter: PROVIDED, That no such person shall receive a benefit less than that which was being paid at the time his or her benefit ceased.

[ 1988 c 109 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1988 c 109: See note following RCW 2.10.030.